Rhode Island statutes. Title 10 Courts and Civil Procedure — Procedure in Particular Actions
Chapter 18 Wage Earner Receivership

10-18-1.
Short title.

This chapter shall be known and may be cited as the “Wage Earner Receivership Statute.”

History of Section.

P.L. 1972, ch. 186, § 1.

10-18-2.
Definitions.

A “prior creditor” is any creditor who had extended credit prior to the filing of the petition with the court.

A “subsequent creditor” is any creditor who extends credit subsequent to the filing of the petition with the court.

History of Section.

P.L. 1972, ch. 186, § 1.

10-18-3.
Filing of petition.

Any individual debtor whose income from all sources is not greater than the maximum wage earner income, as defined in subsection (b), and who is unable to pay his or her current debts as they mature but is able to make regular future payments on account sufficient to amortize the debts over a period of not more than five (5) years, may file a petition for receivership under this section with the clerk of the superior court in the county of his or her residence.

The maximum wage earner income as used in subsection (a) is hereby defined to mean the greater of the following:

Twelve thousand dollars ($12,000) per annum, or

An amount which, considering the fluctuations in the general price level, is equivalent to twelve thousand dollars ($12,000) per annum in calendar year 1968.

Changes in the price level shall be computed by the state controller using the consumer price index of the bureau of labor statistics of the United States department of labor. The foregoing computation shall be made annually, or more frequently at the discretion of the state controller.

The petition shall be under oath and shall set forth the following:

That the debtor is unable to meet his or her current debts as they mature;

The names and addresses of his or her employer or employers, the income received from each, the periods for which received and when payable;

Whether the petitioner is married, the name, age, and relationship of each person depending upon him or her for support and the approximate amount required for the petitioner’s and his or her dependents’ support;

A list of all his or her creditors, with the names and addresses of and the amount owing to each, the nature of the claim, whether the indebtedness is secured or unsecured, the nature of the security, if any, and whether any listed claim is disputed, together with the amount claimed by the creditor and the amount claimed by the debtor;

A description of all actions, suits or proceedings which are, to the best of his or her knowledge, in effect against him or her.

Upon filing the petition, the debtor shall pay to the clerk of the court the sum of five dollars ($5.00) as a filing fee.

History of Section.

P.L. 1972, ch. 186, § 1.

10-18-4.
Appointment of receiver and assignment.

After the debtor has filed a petition for a wage earner receivership plan, the court shall select a receiver who shall be an attorney authorized to practice in Rhode Island.

The debtor shall deliver to the receiver a written assignment of all of his or her future wages, salaries, and commissions.

The receiver shall give bond to be approved by the court.

History of Section.

P.L. 1972, ch. 186, § 1.

10-18-5.
Resignation and removal of receiver — Termination of receivership.

The receiver may resign only on permission of a justice of the superior court.

The receiver may be removed by any creditor or the debtor at any time by application to the court and upon good cause satisfactory to the court being shown for his or her removal.

Upon resignation or removal of the receiver or termination of the receivership for any other reason:

If such event occurs during the pendency of the plan, the court shall appoint a successor receiver in accordance with the provisions of §

10-18-4

; and

The receiver shall render full accounting to the court of the transactions under the plan during his or her service as receiver.

History of Section.

P.L. 1972, ch. 186, § 1.

10-18-6.
Compensation of receiver.

The receiver shall be compensated in an amount as determined by the superior court at such times as the court shall in its discretion determine. The receiver shall also be reimbursed for any costs incurred during the receivership. The amounts accrued as costs may be charged by the receiver to the debtor or deducted from distributions to be made by the receiver. Allocations of the amounts to particular distributions shall be within the discretion of the receiver.

History of Section.

P.L. 1972, ch. 186, § 1.

10-18-7.
Effect of filing.

After the filing of the petition with the court under this chapter and until the dismissal of these proceedings, no prior creditor or subsequent creditor seeking the collection of any claim may levy or enforce any judgment, execution, attachment, garnishment, or other legal or equitable process or proceeding against the property, real or personal, including, but not limited to, wages, salaries, or commission of the debtor; nor may any assignment of wages be enforced against the debtor.

Upon the filing of the petition, the court shall by order require that all such proceedings be so stayed and the debtor shall be entitled to have a copy of the order served upon any or all of his or her creditors and his or her employer(s).

With respect to the claims to be amortized under this chapter, the time between the filing of the petition with the court or the inclusion of the claim in these proceedings, whichever is later, and the dismissal of these proceedings shall not be counted as a part of the period of any statute of limitations.

History of Section.

P.L. 1972, ch. 186, § 1.

10-18-8.
Filing of the accepted plan with the secretary of state and its effect.

After the plan submitted by the receiver is approved by the court, it shall be filed by the clerk of the court with the secretary of state within twenty-one (21) days from the time of the original filing of the petition with the court. The filing shall have the following effect:

Except as stated in §

10-18-11(b)

, all subsequent creditors shall be excluded from the plan.

All prior creditors who have not been included in the plan shall be excluded from the plan unless the creditor, the receiver or the debtor makes application to the court within ten (10) days after the filing of the plan with the secretary of state.

All unsecured creditors excluded from the plan by force of subsections (a)(1) and (a)(2) of this section must wait until the dismissal of these proceedings before collecting upon their claims. Secured creditors’ rights are determined by §§

10-18-10

and

10-18-11(c)

.

History of Section.

P.L. 1972, ch. 186, § 1.

10-18-9.
Effect of approval of plan on prior unsecured creditors.

All prior unsecured creditors, who have been scheduled in the plan from the initial filing of the petition with the court or whose application has been submitted to the court within ten (10) days of filing with the secretary of state as provided in §

10-18-8(a)(2)

, must join the plan if it is approved.

History of Section.

P.L. 1972, ch. 186, § 1.

10-18-10.
Effect of approval of plan on prior secured creditors.

All prior secured creditors who have been scheduled in the plan from the initial filing of the petition with the court or whose application has been submitted to the court within ten (10) days of filing with the secretary of state as provided in §

10-18-8(a)(2)

may either:

Join the plan if approved and receive payments as determined by the plan; or

Reclaim or repossess the collateral sold on security.

If a prior secured creditor has not been scheduled in the plan from the initial filing of the petition with the court and whose application has not been submitted to the court within ten (10) days of the filing with the secretary of state as provided in §

10-18-8(a)(2)

, he or she may reclaim or repossess the collateral sold on security if the debtor defaults upon the contract of sale unless the retention of the collateral by the debtor is essential to the continuance of his or her employment upon reasonable terms and conditions. In such case subsection (e) of this section shall apply.

If a secured creditor under subsection (a)(2) or (b) of this section or §

10-18-11(c)

reclaims or repossesses the collateral sold on security, that shall be the extent of his or her recovery.

Notwithstanding §

10-18-7

, any action, judicial or non-judicial, by a secured creditor under subsection (a)(2) or (b) of this section or §

10-18-11(c)

for the purpose of reclaiming or repossessing collateral sold on security shall be enforced.

At any time either during the pendency of proceedings hereunder or pursuant to subsection (a)(2) or (b) of this section or §

10-18-11(c)

and before a secured creditor shall have acquired actual possession of the collateral to which this subsection applies, the debtor may petition the court, upon notice to the secured creditor, to stay any action, judicial or nonjudicial, by the secured creditor to reclaim or repossess such collateral as the debtor shall identify in his or her petition on the grounds that the retention of the collateral by the debtor is essential to the continuance of his or her employment upon reasonable terms and conditions. Upon the filing of a written notice by the secured creditor, within twenty (20) days of the service upon him or her of a copy of the petition, the court shall order a hearing and, upon a determination for the debtor, shall order a stay which shall be effective during the pendency of these proceedings. The stay shall automatically terminate if the debtor shall fail to pay to the creditor on any installment date, as provided in the plan, a payment in the minimum amount of the approximate depreciation in the fair market value of the relevant collateral for the period since the previous payment or the installments actually due under the relevant deferred payment contract, whichever is less. The amount may be fixed by the court and may be varied from time to time upon petition to the court by the secured creditor, the receiver, or the debtor, with notice to all other parties.

Notwithstanding subsection (e) of this section, a creditor may at any time during the pendency of proceedings herein, petition the court to reclaim or repossess such collateral as such creditor may identify in his or her petition. A creditor may also petition the court to direct the receiver to distribute assets in his or her possession. The court shall determine the manner of giving notice of such petitions and shall in its discretion grant, deny, or modify the creditor’s petition.

History of Section.

P.L. 1972, ch. 186, § 1.

10-18-11.
Subsequent creditors.

All subsequent creditors who have obtained the receiver’s approval prior to their extension of credit may be included in the plan upon application to the court by the creditor, the receiver, or the debtor.

The court, upon application by a creditor to be included in the plan, may include such creditors in the plan if it determines that the extension of credit to the debtor was reasonable. The court’s criteria in the process of determining the reasonableness of a creditor’s extension of credit shall include, but not be limited to, the following:

Amount of credit extended;

Purpose for which the credit was extended;

Terms upon which the credit was extended;

Debtor’s ability to meet this extra financial obligation in light of his or her financial position under the plan.

If a subsequent secured creditor extends credit without the receiver’s approval, the secured creditor may reclaim or repossess the collateral sold on security if the debtor defaults upon the contract of sale unless the retention of such collateral by the debtor is essential to the continuance of his or her employment upon reasonable terms and conditions. In such case, §

10-18-10(e)

shall apply.

History of Section.

P.L. 1972, ch. 186, § 1.

10-18-12.
Claims brought to judgment — Priority in case of default.

All creditors (secured and unsecured, prior and subsequent, those included and those excluded from the plan) may bring their claims against the debtor to judgment.

If these proceedings are terminated by dismissal, default, or otherwise:

Any claim reduced to judgment by a subsequent creditor excluded from the plan shall be deemed to have been reduced to judgment one day after these proceedings are terminated.

Any claim reduced to judgment by a prior creditor (whether included or excluded from the plan) or a subsequent creditor included in the plan within a reasonable time after termination of these proceedings shall be deemed to have been reduced to judgment as of the day these proceedings are terminated.

History of Section.

P.L. 1972, ch. 186, § 1.

10-18-13.
Establishment of plan.

Upon his or her appointment, the receiver shall forthwith meet with the debtor, review the petition and send notice to each creditor listed in the petition and to any other creditor of whose existence as a creditor the receiver may learn within the notice period as prescribed in §

10-18-8(a)(2)

. The notice shall include a copy of §§

10-18-6

—

10-18-12

a schedule of the debtor’s obligations, and notice that a meeting shall be held at a place selected by the receiver and at a time not less than fifteen (15) nor more than thirty (30) days thereafter for the purposes of considering an amortization plan and of determining the claims to be covered by the plan.

The amount of a creditor’s claim shall be the amount for which the debtor could have paid or prepaid the claim on a date ten (10) days after the petition was filed either: (1) pursuant to the terms of the obligation; (2) pursuant to the requirements of any applicable statute; or (3) in accordance with the customary practices of the creditor at such time, whichever is the lowest.

All claims included in the plan shall bear interest during the pendency of the plan at the rate applicable to unpaid judgments in this state. If the plan so provides, the interest may be precomputed at the time the plan is established as if all payments were made on the scheduled installment dates and all payments actually made to creditors under the plan applied to the combined total of interest and principal without reference to the date the payments are actually made.

The claim of any creditor under the plan shall not include the part of the obligation of the debtor to that creditor which, pursuant to the terms of the obligation and without reference in those terms to any provision accelerating any unpaid portion of the obligation because of debtor’s default or otherwise, is payable more than five (5) years from the date the petition is filed hereunder.

Upon conclusion of the meeting, the receiver shall either:

Report to the court that no equitable plan of amortization is feasible or needed in which case the court may forthwith dismiss the proceedings; or

Recommend to the court a plan of amortization calculated by weekly or monthly payments to discharge in full the claims of all known creditors within a period of not exceeding five (5) years.

The receiver shall attach to the plan the written consents and objections, if any, of the creditors present or represented at the meeting or who have otherwise submitted consents or objections to him or her, and an analysis, with his or her recommendations regarding the disposition of any claim in dispute.

If satisfied that the plan is feasible and equitable, the court shall forthwith enter an order approving the plan and ordering the payment by the employer of the debtor of such salary, wages, commissions, or any combination thereof of the debtor to the receiver as provided by the plan and determining, for the purposes of the plan, the amounts of the claims; otherwise, the court shall enter an order dismissing these proceedings. However, if in any written objection a creditor shall ask for a hearing respecting the plan the court shall set a date for a hearing as soon as practicable on notice to all parties. At that hearing the court shall enter an order either approving the plan, if satisfied that it is feasible and equitable, or dismissing these proceedings or making and approving such modifications of the plan as the court deems just. If the plan is approved, the clerk of the court shall so notify the employer or employers of the petitioner and serve him or her with a copy of the order of the court.

History of Section.

P.L. 1972, ch. 186, § 1.

10-18-14.
Contents and payments of plan.

The plan, giving due regard to the reasonable requirements of the debtor and his or her dependents, shall provide for periodic payments by or on behalf of the debtor to the receiver by virtue of the wage assignment and court order, or otherwise; and the debtor may make additional payments to the receiver. If the debtor is required by an order of a court of competent jurisdiction to pay money for the support and maintenance of dependents, then, upon the filing with the court of a certified copy of the order, the plan shall be modified to the extent required to comply with the order.

In no case shall the plan provide for receipt by the debtor from the receiver or otherwise of an amount less than the minimum amount of the income of the debtor that is exempt from garnishment under the laws of this state or federal law.

Subject both to §

10-18-10(e)

on minimum amounts to be paid to certain secured creditors and to this section, the plan shall provide for the receiver to pay, to the extent of funds received by him or her, a pro rata share of the balance to each creditor on the basis of the amount of the claim of each creditor; provided, however, that claims of ten dollars ($10.00) or less may be paid in full.

The plan shall provide that if the total amount available to be distributed is less than two hundred fifty dollars ($250), the receiver may deposit the undistributed amount in a special trust account until the next distribution date that the total amount is two hundred fifty dollars ($250) or more.

Any money which is not called for by any creditor, or, if sent to a creditor, is returned undelivered and which remains in the possession of the receiver for more than six (6) months after these proceedings are dismissed, must be paid by the receiver to the other creditors in proportion to their unpaid obligations under the plan on the date these proceedings were dismissed, provided that no creditor is paid in excess of the full amount of his or her claim as of the date payment is made. If no such creditors exist, then the money shall be paid to the debtor.

The court may, upon application of the debtor, the receiver, or any creditor, upon notice to all other parties, at any time or times during the pendency of these proceedings, increase or reduce the amount of the installment payments provided by the plan, or extend or shorten the time for any payments, or otherwise alter the provisions of the plan, where it shall be made to appear, after hearing, that the circumstances of the debtor so warrant or require.

History of Section.

P.L. 1972, ch. 186, § 1.

10-18-15.
Dispute of claims during pendency of proceedings.

The court, receiver, debtor, or any creditor may dispute the claim of any creditor at any time during the pendency of these proceedings. Upon the filing with the court of a written notice of intention to dispute a claim or upon the determination of the court, on its own motion, to dispute a claim, the court shall cause notice of a hearing thereon to be served on all parties and hold a hearing thereon. At the hearing the court may establish the amount of the claim or make such other determination as shall be fair and equitable under the circumstances.

Neither the determination of the amount of any claim for the purposes of the plan, nor the acceptance of payments thereunder, shall affect the right of any creditor to litigate his or her claim and obtain judgment thereon, or the right of the debtor to dispute it, and the amount of any judgments shall be substituted by the receiver for the amount theretofore being used as a basis for distribution.

History of Section.

P.L. 1972, ch. 186, § 1.

10-18-16.
Termination of the plan.

If any payment provided by the plan to be made to the receiver by or on behalf of the debtor is in default or if the debtor has otherwise violated the provisions of this chapter or of the plan, the receiver or any creditor may, and if the default shall have continued for a period of more than thirty (30) days the receiver shall, report the matter to the court. The receiver shall submit a report and his or her recommendations to the court and the court may terminate the plan.

If the addition of any prior creditor included in the plan by reason of the provision in §

10-18-8(a)(2)

or of any subsequent creditor by reason of §

10-18-11(a)

and (b) shall make continuation of the plan unfeasible, the court may, upon petition of the debtor, the receiver, or any creditor, with notice to all other parties, and upon a hearing, terminate these proceedings.

If the debtor makes preferential payments to creditors participating in the plan during the pendency of the proceedings or appears for any reason to be abusing the privileges of this chapter, the receiver shall promptly report the matter to the court and the court may terminate the plan. If the court finds that preferential payments have been made to those creditors participating in the plan, it shall order those creditors who had received a preferential payment to pay over the amount of the preferential payment to the receiver who shall apply it to reduce the debtor’s indebtedness under the plan pro rata, among all creditors participating in the plan. A preferential payment is any payment to a creditor participating in the plan which is, at the time of the payment, in excess of what he or she is entitled to under the plan.

If the plan is terminated prior to completion of the plan, the court shall award a reasonable fee to the receiver which shall be preferred to all other claims against the debtor, except federal or state obligations.

In deciding whether or not to terminate a wage earner receivership plan, whenever the discretion is given, the court shall consider the following criteria:

The feasibility of the plan; whether in light of the debtor’s income and the size of the debt incurred it is reasonable for the debt to be paid off on an amortized basis within the time remaining in the plan;

The knowledge which subsequent creditors had, or should have had, when they extended credit of the prior debts of the debtor;

The knowledge which subsequent creditors had, or should have had, when they extended credit, of the insolvency of the debtor;

The intent of the debtor to abuse the plan by unreasonably incurring debts which, if included in the plan, would make the plan unfeasible;

Prejudice to the interests of those creditors who have participated in the plan in not being able to collect their debts by those means proscribed by this chapter during the pendency of the plan.

History of Section.

P.L. 1972, ch. 186, § 1.

10-18-17.
Duration of proceedings.

Receivership proceedings under this chapter shall continue during the pendency of the plan or until all debts of the debtor are sooner paid or these proceedings are sooner terminated as provided in this chapter.

Upon termination of these proceedings, the court shall discharge the receiver and notify the debtor’s employer who had been subject to an assignment of wages under this chapter that the debtor is no longer subject to such assignment. The receiver shall return to the debtor all assignments received by him or her under this chapter marked “Cancelled.”

If any claim covered by the plan is unpaid in whole or in part at the termination of the plan, all interest accrued during the pendency of these proceedings and unpaid shall be added to the principal amount of the debt, but that interest shall not bear additional interest thereafter.

History of Section.

P.L. 1972, ch. 186, § 1.

10-18-18.
Subpoenas — Costs.

The court may issue subpoenas to compel the attendance of witnesses at hearings held under this chapter. Any costs in connection with such hearings may be assessed against any of the parties in such manner as the court may deem just.

History of Section.

P.L. 1972, ch. 186, § 1.

10-18-19.
Deferred obligations of debtor during pendency of receivership proceedings.

During the pendency of these receivership proceedings, the debtor shall not voluntarily incur obligations for the payment of money at any time in excess of an aggregate amount of one hundred dollars ($100) or incur any secured obligation without the prior approval of the receiver upon the receiver’s determination that the obligations are for the reasonable living requirements of the debtor or his or her family or dependents and that payments of the obligations will not represent an undue hazard to the successful completion of the plan.

History of Section.

P.L. 1972, ch. 186, § 1.

10-18-20.
Notices — Employment changes.

All notices provided for in this chapter may be given by registered or certified mail with return receipt requested, and if the return receipt is not received, the court may order the notice served as process is served in the court, and the cost thereof shall be paid by the person giving notice.

The period of notice for all court hearings for which notice is required shall be at least five (5) days, unless the court by rule or special order shall prescribe a different period of time.

If the debtor changes his or her employer or acquires an additional employer, he or she shall notify the receiver and execute and deliver to the receiver a new assignment of his or her wages if required and the receiver shall give written notice thereof to the new employer.

History of Section.

P.L. 1972, ch. 186, § 1.

10-18-21.
Payments by employers.

Payments by any employer to a receiver in pursuance of notice from the court or the filing of a petition under this chapter or the receipt of an assignment of wages, salary or commissions by a receiver shall be payment to the employee the same as if received by the employee personally, regardless of any defect or invalidity in the instruments or these proceedings, and regardless of any statute of this state relating to wage assignments, garnishments, exemptions, or otherwise to the contrary.

Any employer who pays any salary, wages or commission in violation of a notice received by him or her from the court shall be liable for any sums so paid.

History of Section.

P.L. 1972, ch. 186, § 1.